Maryland, session 2026, HB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–10B–05.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine–based system
that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer
from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1385*

HOUSE BILL 1385
(3) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization; or
(v) any other person that provides health benefit plans subject to
regulation by the State.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) a carrier that:
(i) uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool
for the purpose of utilization review; or
(ii) contracts with or otherwise works through an entity that uses an
artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for the purpose of utilization review;
and
(2) a pharmacy benefits manager or private review agent that:
(i) contracts with a carrier to provide utilization review on behalf of
the carrier; and
(ii) uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool
for the purpose of conducting utilization review on behalf of the carrier.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, an entity subject to this section shall
ensure that:
(1) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool bases its
determinations on:
(i) an enrollee’s medical or other clinical history;
(ii) individual clinical circumstances as presented by a requesting
provider; or
(iii) other relevant clinical information contained in the enrollee’s
medical or other clinical record;

HOUSE BILL 1385 3
(2) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not base
its determinations solely on a group dataset;
(3) the criteria and guidelines for using an artificial intelligence, algorithm,
or other software tool for making determinations comply with the requirements of this title;
(4) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
replace the role of a health care provider in the determination process under § 15–10B–07
of this subtitle;
(5) the use of an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool
does not result in unfair discrimination;
(6) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is fairly and
equitably applied, including in accordance with any applicable regulations and guidance
issued by the federal Department of Health and Human Services;
(7) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is open to
inspection for audit or compliance reviews by the Commissioner IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION;
(8) written policies and procedures are included in the utilization plan
submitted under § 15–10B–05 of this subtitle, including how an artificial intelligence,
algorithm, or other software tool will be used and what oversight will be provided;
(9) the performance, use, and outcomes of an artificial intelligence,
algorithm, or other software tool are reviewed and revised, if necessary and at least on a
quarterly basis, to maximize accuracy and reliability, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION;
(10) patient data is not used beyond its intended and stated purpose,
consistent with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as
applicable; and
(11) an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
directly or indirectly cause harm to an enrollee.
(d) An artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool may not deny,
delay, or modify health care services.
(E) AN AUDIT OR COMPLIANCE REVIEW OF AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(7) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE HUMAN EVALUATION OF A PATIENT’S MEDICAL
RECORDS BY A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL THAT TAKES INTO
CONSIDERATION THE PATIENT’S SPECIFIC CIRCUMSTANCES AND ALLOWS THE
LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL TO QUESTION, MODIFY, OR OVERRIDE A

HOUSE BILL 1385
DETERMINATION MADE BY THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL.
(F) A REVIEW OF THE PERFORMANCE, USE, AND OUTCOMES OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOLS UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(9) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A HUMAN EVALUATION OF THE REAL–WORLD HEALTH OUTCOMES
OF DECISIONS MADE BY THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER
SOFTWARE TOOL; AND
(2) USE OF THE FINDINGS MADE BY THE EVALUATION REQUIRED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO IMPROVE THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL AND MAKE THE DECISIONS OF THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, ALGORITHM, OR OTHER SOFTWARE TOOL SAFER, MORE
ACCURATE, AND MORE RESPONSIVE TO PATIENT NEEDS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.